North Carolina statutes. Chapter 9. Jurors.
Article 3. Peremptory Challenges.

§ 9-19.
Peremptory challenges in civil cases.

The clerk, before a jury is impaneled to try the issues in any civil suit, shall read over the names of the prospective jurors in the presence and hearing of the parties or their counsel; and the parties, or their counsel for them, may challenge peremptorily eight jurors without showing any cause therefor, and the challenges shall be allowed by the court.

History.

1796, c. 452, s. 2, P.R; 1812, c. 833, P.R; R.C., c. 31, s. 35; Code, s. 406; Rev., s. 1964; C.S., s. 2331; 1935, c. 475, s. 1; 1965, c. 1182; 1967, c. 218, s. 1.

§ 9-20.
Civil cases having several plaintiffs or several defendants; challenges apportioned; discretion of judge.

When there are two or more defendants in a civil action, the presiding judge, if it appears that there are antagonistic interests between the defendants, may in the judge’s discretion apportion among the defendants the challenges now allowed by law, or the judge may increase the number of challenges to not exceeding six for each defendant or class of defendants representing the same interest.

When there are two or more plaintiffs in a civil action, the presiding judge, if it appears that there are antagonistic interests between the plaintiffs, may, in the judge’s discretion, apportion among the plaintiffs the challenges now allowed by law, or the judge may increase the number of challenges to not exceeding six for each plaintiff or class of plaintiffs representing the same interest.

Whenever a judge exercises the discretion authorized by subsection (a) or (b) of this section to increase the number of challenges for either the plaintiffs or the defendants, the judge may, in the judge’s discretion, increase the number of challenges for the opposing side, not to exceed the total number given to the other side.

History.

1905, c. 357; Rev., s. 1965; C.S., s. 2332; 1967, c. 218, s. 1; 2007-210, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-210, s. 1, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to actions called for trial on or after that date, inserted “plaintiffs or several” in the section heading; designated the previously undesignated provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), substituted “the judge’s” for “his,” substituted “the judge” for “he,” and deleted the last two sentences which read: “In either event, the same number of challenges shall be allowed each defendant or class of defendants representing the same interest. The decision of the judge as to the nature of the interests and number of challenges shall be final.”; and added subsections (b) and (c).

§ 9-21.
Peremptory challenges in criminal cases governed by Chapter 15A.

Peremptory challenges in criminal cases are governed by Article 72, Selecting and Impaneling the Jury, of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes.

History.

22 Hen. VIII, c. 14, s. 6; 33 Edw. I, c. 4; 1777, c. 115, s. 85, P.R; 1801, c. 592, s. 1, P.R; 1812, c. 833, P.R; 1826, c. 9; 1827, c. 10; R.S., c. 35, ss. 19, 21; R.C., c. 35, ss. 32, 33; 1871-2, c. 39; Code, ss. 1199, 1200; 1887, c. 53; Rev., ss. 3263, 3264; 1907, c. 415; 1913, c. 31, ss. 3, 4; C.S., ss. 4633, 4634; 1935, c. 475, ss. 2, 3; 1967, c. 218, s. 1; 1969, c. 205, s. 7; 1971, c. 75; 1977, c. 711, s. 14.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to peremptory challenges in criminal cases, see

G.S. 15A-1217

.